Utah statutes.
59-2-1352.   Purchaser of invalid tax title -- Purchaser's lien -- Extent of
lien -- Priority of lien -- Foreclosure of lien.
Every person who has purchased or purchases any invalid tax title to any real
property in this state shall, from the effective date of this part, have a
lien against the property for the recovery of the amount of the purchase price
paid to the county to the extent that the county would have a lien prior to
the sale by the county, but in no event may the lien be greater than the
amount of taxes, interest, and penalties, or the amount actually paid,
whichever is smaller.  Taxes paid by the purchaser for subsequent years after
the purchase from the county shall be included in the amount secured by the
lien which has not already been recovered.  The lien shall have the same
priority against the property as the lien for the delinquent taxes which were
liquidated by the purchase except that it may not have preference over any
right, title, interest in, or lien against, the property acquired since the
purchase of the tax title for value and without notice, and the lien shall
bear interest at the legal rate for a period of not to exceed four years.  The
lien shall be foreclosed in any action in which the invalidity of the tax
title is determined.  If the lien is not foreclosed at the time of the
determination of the invalidity of the tax title, any later action to
foreclose the lien shall be barred.
